Utah statutes.
59-2-1313.   Attorney general to prosecute delinquent officers.

If, on examination, it is found that any officer has been guilty of defrauding the state of revenue or has neglected or refused to perform any duty relating to revenue, the attorney general shall prosecute the delinquent officer.

